Utah statutes.
76-8-506.   Providing false information to law enforcement officers, government agencies, or specified professionals.

A person is guilty of a class B misdemeanor if he:

(1)  knowingly gives or causes to be given false information to any peace officer or any state or local government agency or personnel with a purpose of inducing the recipient of the information to believe that another has committed an offense;

(2)  knowingly gives or causes to be given to any peace officer, any state or local government agency or personnel, or to any person licensed in this state to practice social work, psychology, or marriage and family therapy, information concerning the commission of an offense, knowing that the offense did not occur or knowing that he has no information relating to the offense or danger; or

(3)  knowingly gives or causes to be given false information to any state or local government agency or personnel with a purpose of inducing a change in the person's licensing or certification status or the licensing or certification status of another.



Amended by Chapter 92, 2005 General Session

